Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.173, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Salary ranges in job postings required. (a) An employer must disclose in each posting for each job opening with the employer the starting salary range, and a general description of all of the benefits and other compensation, including but not limited to any health or retirement benefits, to be offered to a hired job applicantnew text begin , as well as whether a hired job applicant will be offered a health plan option that complies with the cost-sharing limits under section 62Q.481, subdivision 1new text end . (b) An employer that does not plan to offer a salary range for a position must list a fixed pay rate. A salary range may not be open ended.